Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 29. Public Property and Supplies
Executive Order No. 29-11
(No. 84-84) [Transfer of Land and Premises in Town of Bethel From Agency of Transportation to Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Bethel, County of Windsor and State of Vermont, owned by the State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Transportation have become
and are no longer necessary for state highway purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department
of Fish and Wildlife for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

All and the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Fred L. Whitney by Warranty Deed dated January 3, 1952 and recorded in Volume 40, page 130 of the Bethel Land Records; and further described in said deed as follows:

“Beginning on the southerly edge of the water in the White River as it now stands at its present height; thence S36°W 15 rods and 8 links to an iron pin at the lower side of an old farm road; thence N76°W 15 rods and 5 links to an iron pin with a pile
of stone around it at the edge of the bank; thence N31°30´W 25 rods and 20 links to an iron pin at the base of a 16" beech tree; thence by the nearest line to the water of the White River being about 3 rods; thence easterly down said
river to the place of beginning.”

Dated September 28, 1984.

Executive Order No. 29-12
(No. 23-86) [Transfer of Land and Premises in City of Rutland From Agency of Administration to Military Department.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the City of Rutland, County of Rutland and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings,
has become and is no longer necessary for purposes of the Agency of Administration; and

WHEREAS, the Military Department, State of Vermont, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration to the jurisdiction and control of the Military Department for its purposes the following
described land and premises, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises acquired by the State of Vermont from Evelyn Pierpoint, et al. by Warranty Deed dated June 29, 1897, and recorded in Book 36, Pages 657-658 of the City of Rutland Land Records and being more particularly described
as follows:

Beginning at a point marked with a stone bound on the easterly sideline of Pierpoint Avenue approximately 685 feet northerly of the center line of State Street, which now marks the division line between the lands of the State of Vermont and the Vermont
National Guard, thence running northerly along a bearing of N 1° 13´09" E a distance of 295.0 feet to an Iron Pin Set Flush (IPSF), thence running in a northerly direction along an arc of a circle with a radius of 692.05´ curving to
the right an arc distance of 221.14 l.f. along the easterly boundary of Pierpoint Avenue, the chord of said arc running N 10° 22´21" E for a distance of 220.19 feet, thence running N 19° 31´38" E for a distance of 29.59 feet, thence
continuing in a northerly direction along an arc of a circle with a radius of 1170.75 feet curving to the left an arc distance of 130.50 feet along the easterly boundary of Pierpoint Avenue, the chord of such arc running N 16° 19´59"
E for a distance of 130.43 feet to an Iron Pin Set Flush (IPSF), thence turning a sharp angle to the right and running S 35° 25´24" E for a distance of 561.03 feet to a point in the East Creek, (this line is the division line of property
deeded to the City of Rutland by the State, June 9, 1956 and recorded, BK 103, PG. 117 and land herein described), thence turning a sharp angle to the right and running S 32° 58´31" W for a distance of 8.41 feet to a point in the East
Creek, thence turning a slight angle to the left and running S 20° 20´40" W for a distance of 194.37 feet to a point thence turning a slight angle to the left and running S 13° 52´20" W for a distance of 25.00 feet more or less to
a point in East Creek, thence turning a sharp angle to the right and running N 87° 37´40" W for a distance of 340.0 feet more or less to the point of beginning.

The parcel herein described contains approximately 4.15 acres, more or less.

Dated May 31, 1986.

Executive Order No. 29-13
(No. 26-86) [Transfer of Land in Town of Wolcott From Agency of Transportation to Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands hereinafter described and located in the Town of Wolcott, County of Lamoille and State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation and is no longer necessary for Agency
of Transportation purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Fish and Wildlife desires the transfer of said hereinafter described land for the purpose of enhancing already existing recreational facilities;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department
of Fish and Wildlife for the aforesaid purpose the following described land, to wit;

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Richard C. Sargent and Robert F. McKenzie, Co-Trustees of the Estate of Denning Miller by Trustee’s Deed dated June 18, 1984 and recorded in Book 44, Pages 102-104 of the Town
of Wolcott Land Records and being all of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Roger E. Miller and Alma M. Miller by Warranty Deed dated April 17, 1984 and recorded in Book 44, Pages 90 and 91 of the aforesaid
Town of Wolcott Land Records and being more particularly described as follows:

Being a certain parcel of land consisting of 2.48 acres, more or less, as shown on a plat entitled “State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, Town of Wolcott, Project Wolcott FG-F-BRF 030-2 (4)”, dated February 13, 1986 and which plat is attached hereto
and made a part hereof.

The Agency of Transportation, however, excepts and reserves to the Town of Wolcott from this transfer, an easement to construct and maintain a drainage ditch located at or near and left of approximate survey station 271 + 28 of the revised centerline
of Highway Project Wolcott FG-F-BRF 030-2 (4) and thereby the right to discharge water through said drainage ditch on to the hereinbefore described parcel of land.

Dated July 14, 1986.

Executive Order No. 29-14
(No. 28-86) [Accessibility to Handicapped Persons of Buildings Used for Public Meetings Relating to State Government Business.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-64 (codified as Executive Order No. 05-14), dated October 21, 2014.

Executive Order No. 29-15
(No. 41-87) [Transfer of Lands in City of Burlington From Agency of Transportation to Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Wildlife Department.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands hereinafter described and located in the City of Burlington, County of Chittenden and State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Wildlife Department, desires jurisdiction over certain lands of the Agency of Transportation, for the sole purpose of wildlife management and for perpetual conservation to replace wetland habitat
permanently lost in the construction of the highways known as the Northern Connector and Southern Connector; and

WHEREAS, the lands as described below in Exhibit “A” and Exhibit “B” compensate fully and exclusively for the natural values lost in the construction of the Northern and Southern Connectors and shall be managed and enhanced for wildlife habitat;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Wildlife Department, jurisdiction over certain lands of the Agency of Transportation
for the sole purpose of habitat development, wildlife management and the perpetual conservation of natural resources as hereinafter described as Exhibit “A” and Exhibit “B”.

Exhibit “A”:

Being a perpetual easement for maintaining and controlling a wetland habitat enhancement area on a certain parcel of land commonly referred to as the Howe Farm and described as follows:

Beginning at a point shown on the plan of Burlington highway project M 5000 (3), sheet 47 of 48 and noted as “station 465 + 34, 242 feet right”; thence southwesterly about 92 feet to a point noted as “465 + 77, 150 feet right”; thence generally southerly
and 150 feet parallel to the baseline of construction as shown on the plans to a point marked by a STATE OF VERMONT aluminum pipe monument stamped “ROW 1983” and set flush with the ground 150.0 feet right of station 442 + 35 as shown
on plan sheet 41 of 48 and further identified by Vermont State Plane Coordinates y = 736,713.5, x = 306,363.6; thence continuing by grid distance and azimuths; 616.8 feet 48°58´12" to a point located 150.0 feet 323°18´51" from a STATE
OF VERMONT aluminum pipe monument stamped “B 1983” set flush to the ground; thence 1313.4 feet 323°18´51" to a STATE OF VERMONT aluminum pipe monument stamped “C 1983” set flush to the ground; thence 827.0 feet 323°18´50" to a STATE
OF VERMONT aluminum pipe monument stamped “D 1983” set flush to the ground; thence 1087.5 feet 10°09´20" to a STATE OF VERMONT aluminum pipe monument stamped “E 1983” set flush with the ground near the southerly bank of a seasonally
dry channel of the Winooski River; thence continue on the same azimuth to the southerly bank of the river; thence to the center of the river and the boundary between the City of Burlington and Colchester; thence down stream along the
boundary between the City of Burlington and Colchester to a point opposite the point of beginning of this description; thence to the noted point of beginning. The land area enclosed by this description constitutes approximately 66
acres depending on the variable flow of the river and is all of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Roderick Whittier and Richard Farnham by Warranty Deed dated February 6, 1984, and recorded in Book 302,
Pages 350-353 of the City of Burlington Land Records.

Exhibit “B”:

Being a perpetual easement for maintaining and controlling a wetland habitat enhancement area on a certain parcel of land commonly referred to as the Intervale Cattail Marsh and described as follows:

Commencing at a point marking the southwest corner of land, conveyed to the State of Vermont by City of Burlington by Warranty Deed dated February 24, 1986, and recorded in Book 328, Page 593A of the City of Burlington Land Records, and which point is
also along the boundary line of the existing railroad right-of-way of the Central Vermont Railway; thence proceeding in a northwesterly direction 725´ to a point; then continuing in a northwesterly direction 400´ to a point, which
point is 250´ right of the point designated 335 on the survey line of the Burlington Beltline, so-called; then continuing in a northwesterly direction 500´ to a point, which point is 201´ right of the point designated 340 on the survey
line of said Burlington Beltline; then continuing in a northwesterly direction for 375´ to a point which is the northwesterly corner of the property being herein conveyed; then turning to the right at an angle of 60°16´43" and continuing
in a northeasterly direction for 863.16´ to a point; then continuing at an angle of 64°26´04" for 441.01´ to a point which constitutes the most northerly point of the land of the State of Vermont; thence turning to the right at an
angle of 145°25´29" and proceeding in a southeasterly direction for 546.01´ to a point, then continuing in a southeasterly direction at an angle of 145°27´51" for a distance of 450.66´ to a point; then continuing in a southeasterly
direction at an angle of 141°58´59" for 68.01´ to a point; then continuing a southeasterly direction at an angle of 145°22´11" for 464.73´ to a point; then turning to the left and proceeding in a northeasterly direction at an angle
of 93°50´21" for a distance of 833.29´ to a point; then turning to the right and proceeding in a southeasterly direction at an angle of 180°17´59" for 471.95´ to a point; then turning to the left and proceeding in a southeasterly direction
at an angle of 107°47´59" for a 380.49´ to a point; then turning to the right and proceeding in a southwesterly direction at an angle of 193°46´23" for 1009.21´ to a point; then continuing in a southwesterly direction at an angle of
196°17´19" for a distance of 118.35´ to a point; then turning to the right and proceeding in a northwesterly direction at an angle of 282°40´56" for 93.62´ to a point; then deflecting to the right and proceeding in a northwesterly
direction at an angle of 328°04´50" for 279.49´ to a point; then proceeding in a northwesterly direction at an angle of 282°25´02" for 344.87´ to a point; then turning to the left and proceeding in a southwesterly direction at an angle
of 215°47´48" for a distance of 217.71´ to a point; then proceeding in a westerly direction at an angle of 282°31´51" for 1470.25´ to a point; then continuing in a westerly direction at an angle of 282°03´38" for 147.38´ to a point;
then continuing in a westerly direction at an angle of 281°18´41" for a distance of 122.46´ to the point or place of beginning. The land area enclosed by this description is 122 acres, more or less.

Also included in this transfer is an easement over other lands, now or formerly of Roderick Whittier and Richard Farnham for the purposes of ingress and egress to and from the premises for maintaining a wetland habitat enhancement area, and laying and
maintaining waterlines from the closest point of the Winooski River to said wetland habitat enhancement area and the use of said easement shall not interfere with the use of the land by Roderick Whittier and Richard Farnham, their
heirs and assigns.

The Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Wildlife Department, upon this transfer, will assume the responsibility for all future, management, maintenance and construction outside the highway right-of-way line and assumes the responsibility of
monitoring water levels to avoid encroachment on adjoining properties unless flowage easements are obtained.

The Agency of Environmental Conservation, Fish and Wildlife Department also agrees to comply with all conditions imposed on the herein described areas by permits obtained by the Corps of Engineers, Vermont Act 250 and Agency of Environmental Conservation,
Department of Water Resources and Environmental Engineering Dam Permit and all covenants and conditions included in the deeds transferring the herein described properties to the Agency of Transportation.

Dated February 26, 1987.

Executive Order No. 29-16
(No. 54-87) [Transfer of Certain Premises in Town of Alburg From Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain premises in the Town of Alburg, County of Grand Isle, State of Vermont, owned by the State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation
has become and is no longer necessary for state forest and park purposes; and

WHEREAS, the hereinafter described premises are more suitable for wildlife management purposes,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the jurisdiction and control of the Department of
Fish and Wildlife for its purposes, the following described premises, to wit:

all that portion of the former Central Vermont Railway, Incorporated property, and all that portion of the former Rutland Railroad Corporation property which lies between the east shore of Lake Champlain at West Alburg, and the New York State border.

The Central Vermont Railway, Incorporated property was conveyed to the State of Vermont by Quitclaim deed dated April 12, 1965, and is recorded in Book 38, page 204 of the Alburg Land Records, the Rutland Railway Corporation property was conveyed to the
State of Vermont by Quitclaim deed dated March 3, 1965 and is recorded in Book 38, page 186 of the Alburg Land Records.

Dated December 10, 1987.

Executive Order No. 29-17
(No. 64-88) [Transfer of Lands in Towns of Concord, Chester and Hardwick From Agency of Transportation to Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands hereinafter described and located in the Town of Concord, County of Essex, and State of Vermont, Town of Chester, County of Windsor, and State of Vermont, and Town of Hardwick, County of Caledonia and State of Vermont
and all presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation and are no longer necessary for Agency of Transportation purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife desires the transfer of said hereinafter described land for the purpose of enhancing already existing recreational facilities;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish
and Wildlife for the aforesaid purpose the following described lands, to wit:

Parcel #1 —Town of Concord

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to State of Vermont by Curtis A. Lanpher by Warranty Deed dated November 1, 1956, and recorded in Book 37, Page 223 of the Town of Concord Land Records, and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point 100 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate survey station 201 + 03 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as said CL) of Highway Project Concord F 208-4 (1);

thence 1,155 feet, more or less, northeasterly along the Moose River to a point 350 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate survey station 209 + 50 of said CL;

thence 250 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point, 100 feet distant, northwesterly at right angle from approximate survey station 209 + 50 of said CL;

thence 820 feet, more or less, southwesterly to the point of beginning.

The above described parcel of land consisting of 2.5 acres, more or less, as shown on the attached plat entitled “State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, Town of Concord” dated January 19, 1988, and labeled “Exhibit A.”

Excepting and reserving from this conveyance the right of the State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation to enter upon land of the State of Vermont, Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife to maintain two (2) culverts. The first running
under existing U.S. Route #2 and through the above described parcel of land to the Moose River and located at or near and left of approximate survey station 203 + 99, more or less, of the established centerline of Highway Project Concord
F 028-4 (1), and the second running under existing U.S. Route #2 onto the above described parcel of land and located at or near and left of approximate survey station 208 + 99 of the aforesaid established centerline, as shown on the
attached plat labeled “Exhibit A.”

Parcel #2 —Town of Chester

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Henry J. Chapman and Jennie W. Chapman by Condemnation Order dated October 11, 1969, and recorded in Book 39, Page 460 of the Town of Chester Land Records, and being more particularly
described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the Williams River 150 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate survey station 45 + 90 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as said CL) of Highway Project Chester F 025-1
(8);

thence 1,130 feet, more or less, northerly and northeasterly along the railroad right-of-way to a point 470 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate survey station 61 + 65 of said CL;

thence 350 feet, more or less, northeasterly to a point, 90 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate survey station 62 + 25 of said CL;

thence 890 feet, more or less, southerly and southwesterly and parallel to said CL to a point 90 feet distant northwesterly radially from approximate survey station 52 + 50 of said CL;

thence 642 feet, more or less, southwesterly to the point of beginning.

The above described parcel of land consists of 8.1 acres, more or less, as shown on the attached plat entitled “State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, Town of Chester,” and dated January 25, 1988, and labeled “Exhibit B.”

Parcel #3 —Town of Hardwick

Being all of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Carl Loura and Daisy G. Loura by Warranty Deed dated August 7, 1933, and recorded in Book 36, Page 354 of the Town of Hardwick Land Records, and being more particularly described
as follows:

Beginning at a point 24.75 feet distant southeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 77 + 12 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as said CL) of Highway Project Hardwick S 8 (2), thence 309.4 feet,
more or less, S 66°45´30" E to a point, thence 368.1 feet, more or less, S 24°19´30" W to a point, thence 319.2 feet, more or less, S 26°07´ W to a point, thence 366.6 feet, more or less, S 24°35´ W to a point, thence 156 feet, more
or less, N 71°51´30" W to a point, thence 27 feet, more or less, N 62°24´30" W to a point 24.75 feet distant southeasterly at right angle from approximate survey station 66 + 36 of the aforesaid established centerline, thence 1,076
feet, more or less, northeasterly and parallel to said CL to the point of beginning.

The above described parcel of land consists of 6.34 acres, more or less, as shown on the attached plat entitled “State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, Town of Hardwick” dated February 17, 1988, and labeled “Exhibit C.”

Dated August 18, 1988.

Executive Order No. 29-18
(No. 65-88) [Transfer of Certain Lands in Town of Groton From Agency of Transportation to Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation and Grant of Temporary Easement to Transportation Agency.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands hereinafter described and located in the Town of Groton, County of Caledonia and State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks
and Recreation, and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control over certain lands of the Agency of Natural Resources; Department
of Forests, Parks and Recreation for its purposes; said lands being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Carroll R. Palmer and Joan A. Palmer by Quit-Claim Deed dated July 14, 1978 and recorded in Book 29, Pages 606-608 of the Town of Groton Land Records; said land being designated
as Parcel #6 as shown on Pages 6, 10, and 14 of the plans of Highway Project Groton F 026-1 (27)S, a plat of which is attached hereto and made a part hereof, and with reference to said plat being more particularly described as follows:

Parcel #6:

Beginning at a point in the existing southeasterly right-of-way boundary of U.S. Route #302, 26 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate survey station 97 + 89 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to said
CL) of Highway Project Groton F 026-1 (27)S;

thence 41 feet, more or less, southeasterly and parallel to said CL along the aforesaid existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of U.S. Route #302 to a point 26 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate survey station 98 + 30 of said CL;

thence 21 feet, more or less, southeasterly, to a point 42 feet distant radially from station 98 + 43 of said CL;

thence 41 feet, more or less, northwesterly and parallel to said CL to a point 42 feet distant radially from station 98 + 02 of said CL;

thence 21 feet, more or less, northwesterly to the point of beginning.

Said Parcel #6 contains 0.01 acre, more or less.

Also included in this transfer are the following easements and/or rights required for the construction of Highway Project Groton F 026-1 (27)S:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 40 square feet, more or less, as shown on Pages 5 and 14 of the plans of said Highway Project a plat of which is attached hereto and made a part
hereof. The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The Agency of Transportation
shall have the right to remove all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, bush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation for construction purposes including the right to cut and dispose of all trees,
down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris in an area which contains 280 square feet, more or less, and is located right of and between approximate survey stations 98 + 02 and 98 + 48 of the established centerline of said Highway
Project, as shown on a plat which is attached hereto and made a part hereof.

Dated August 18, 1988.

Executive Order No. 29-19
(No. 66-88) [Transfer of Certain Permanent Easement Located in City of Montpelier From Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that a certain permanent easement hereinafter described and located in the City of Montpelier, County of Washington and State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of
State Buildings, and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said permanent easement for its purposes:

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control over a certain permanent easement of the Agency of Administration,
Department of State Buildings for its purposes; said permanent easement being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by William F. Corry, Frank C. Corry, Florence E. Corry, and Ruth Corry Lyman by Warranty Deed dated June 2, 1949, and recorded in Book 65, Pages 303-305 of the City of Montpelier
Land Records; said permanent easement being designated as Parcel #18 as shown on Pages 8, 14 and 15 of the plans of Highway Project Montpelier M6400 (23), a plat of which is attached hereto and made a part hereof, and with reference
to said plat being more particularly described as follows:

An easement to change and maintain, if necessary, the channel of a certain stream of water now running on land of the Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings located left of and between approximate survey stations 552 + 62 and 552 + 83
of the revised centerline of said Highway Project, as shown on plat hereto and made a part hereof.

Dated August 18, 1988.

Executive Order No. 29-20
(No. 72A-89) [Transfer Certain Permanent Easements in Town of Berlin from Board of Armory Commissioners to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain permanent easements hereinafter described and located in the Town of Berlin, County of Washington, and State of Vermont are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Board of Armory Commissioners of the State
of Vermont, and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said permanent easements for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control over certain permanent easements of the Board of Armory Commissioners
for its purposes, and being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the City of Montpelier by Warranty Deed dated December 10, 1964 and recorded in Book 36, Page 59 of the Town of Berlin Land Records; said land being designated as Parcel #11
as shown on Pages 4 and 5 of the plans of Highway Project Berlin M 6200 (1)S, Section I and as Parcel #104 as shown on Pages 5, 7, and 8 of the plans of Highway Project Berlin M 6200 (1)S, Section II, and which plats are so designated
and which are attached hereto and made a part hereof, and with reference to said plats being more particularly described as follows:

Parcel #11:

An easement for constructing, maintaining and servicing a highway, in an area of 0.01 acre, more or less, and located between a point right of approximate survey station 51 + 00 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project and a point right of approximate
station 52 + 48 of the established centerline of said Highway Project, and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Town Highway #6 (Fisher Road) 25 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate station 51 + 00 of the revised centerline (Revised centerline hereinafter referred to as
REV. CL.) of Highway Project Berlin M 6200 (1)S, Section I;

thence 146 feet, more or less, southeasterly along the aforesaid southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Town Highway #6 (Fisher Road) to a point 20 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate station 52 + 46 of said REV. CL.;

thence 5 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point 25 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate station 52 + 48 of the REV. CL.;

thence 148 feet, more or less, northwesterly to the point of beginning.

Also included in this transfer is the following easement and/or right required for the construction of Highway Project Berlin M 6200 (1)S, Section I;

An easement to construct and maintain a drainage ditch between a point right of approximate survey station 52 + 48 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project and a point right of approximate survey station 52 + 58 of the established centerline
of said Highway Project.

Parcel #104:

An easement for constructing, and servicing a highway, in an area of 0.08 acre, more or less, and located right of and between approximate survey stations 47 + 43 and 52 + 00 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project, and being more particularly
described as follows:

Beginning at a point in Town Highway #6 (Fisher Pond) 17 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 45 + 31 of the revised centerline (revised centerline hereinafter referred to as REV. CL.) of Highway Project Berlin M 6200 (1)S;
Section II;

thence 211 feet, more or less southeasterly to a point in the centerline of Town Highway #6 (Fisher Pond) at centerline station 47 + 43 of said REV. CL.;

thence 32 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point 32 feet distant at right angle from station 47 + 43 of said REV. CL.;

thence 143 feet, more or less, northwesterly and parallel to said REV. CL. to a point 32 feet distant, southwesterly at right angle from station 46 + 00 of said REV. CL.;

thence 53 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point 85 feet, distant southwesterly at right angle from station 46 + 00 of said REV. CL.;

thence 84 feet, more or less, northwesterly to a point 105 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from station 45 + 18 of said REV. CL.;

thence 123 feet, more or less, northeasterly to the point of beginning.

Also included in this transfer are the following easements and/or rights required for the construction of Highway Project Berlin M 6200 (1)S, Section II;

Easement to extend highway slopes and embankments in areas of 0.05 acre, more or less, and 0.01 acre, more or less, and a temporary easement during the period of construction to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 0.04 acre, more or less
and shown on Pages 7 and 8 of the plans of said Highway Project, a plat of which is attached hereto and made a part hereof. The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose
against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The Agency of Transportation shall have the right to remove all tree logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and any other objectionable
materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

An easement in an area of 0.05 acre, more or less, to construct and maintain a ditch located right of and between approximate survey stations 47 + 43 and 50 + 82 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project.

An easement to install and maintain a culvert located right of and between approximate survey stations 50 + 82 and 51 + 53 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Adjutant General to construct a drive located at or near and right of approximate survey station 51 + 18 of the revised centerline of said Highway Project.

Dated March 16, 1989.